Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,194
Director; powers and duties.

The director shall ratify and do all things necessary to effectuate the International Registration Plan Act with such exceptions as are deemed advisable and such changes as are necessary.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 194.